Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB620.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 501.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Conduct is the cause of a result when it is an antecedent without which the result in
question would not have occurred.
(2) When intentionally causing a particular result is an element of an offense, the
element is not established if the actual result is not within the intention or the
contemplation of the actor unless:
(a) The actual result differs from that intended or contemplated, as the case may
be, only in the respect that a different person or different property is injured or
affected or that the injury or harm intended or contemplated would have been
more serious or more extensive; or
(b) The actual result involves the same kind of injury or harm as that intended or
contemplated and occurs in a manner which the actor knows or should know
is rendered substantially more probable by his or her conduct.
(3) When wantonly or recklessly causing a particular result is an element of an offense,
the element is not established if the actual result is not within the risk of which the
actor is aware or, in the case of recklessness, of which he or she should be aware
unless:
(a) The actual result differs from the probable result only in the respect that a
different person or different property is injured or affected or that the probable
injury or harm would have been more serious or more extensive than that
caused; or
(b) The actual result involves the same kind of injury or harm as the probable
result and occurs in a manner which the actor knows or should know is
rendered substantially more probable by his or her conduct.
(4) The question of whether an actor knew or should have known the result he or she
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 213
caused was rendered substantially more probable by his or her conduct is an issue
of fact.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:26 PM Jacketed